Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-616
Certain deaths and injuries; suspension or revocation of permits.

The court shall automatically suspend the privilege to hunt, fish, and harvest fur and to purchase permits to hunt, fish, and harvest fur in the State of Nebraska of a person who is convicted of the intentional or negligent killing or injuring of any other person with a firearm or bow and arrow while hunting, fishing, or fur harvesting and shall automatically revoke all permits to hunt, fish, and harvest fur in the State of Nebraska held by a person who is convicted of the intentional or negligent killing or injuring of any other person with a firearm or bow and arrow while hunting, fishing, or fur harvesting. The suspension or revocation shall be for a period of not less than ten years after such conviction.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 306.